Wisconsin, session 2025, AB165.
do enact as follows:AB165,1Section 1. 66.0601 (1) (d) of the statutes is created to read:66.0601 (1) (d) Guaranteed income program. 1. In this paragraph:a. “Guaranteed income program” means a program under which individuals are provided with regular periodic cash payments that are unearned and that may be used for any purpose. “Guaranteed income program” does not include a program under which an individual is required to perform work or attend training.b. “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.2. No political subdivision may expend moneys of the political subdivision, including shared revenue payments under subch. I of ch. 79, moneys raised by levying taxes, or fee revenues, for the purpose of making payments to individuals under a guaranteed income program. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab165 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab165 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB165 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB165 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB165: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting